Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-506
Employer; actions prohibited.

(1) An employer shall not interfere with, restrain, or deny the exercise of or the attempt to exercise any right provided under the Family Military Leave Act.

(2) An employer shall not discharge, fine, suspend, expel, discipline, or in any other manner discriminate against any employee who exercises any right provided under the act.

(3) An employer shall not discharge, fine, suspend, expel, discipline, or in any other manner discriminate against any employee for opposing any practice made unlawful by the act.

Laws 2007, LB497, § 6.